Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.72.140

Jury tampering.

(1) A person is guilty of jury tampering if with intent to influence a juror's vote, opinion, decision, or other official action in a case, he or she attempts to communicate directly or indirectly with a juror other than as part of the proceedings in the trial of the case.

(2) Jury tampering is a gross misdemeanor.

[ 2011 c 336 s 396; 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.72.140.]